Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.415.270

Principal internship support program.

(1) To the extent funds are appropriated, the Washington state principal internship support program is created beginning in the 1994-95 school year. The purpose of the program is to provide funds to school districts to provide partial release time for district employees who are in a principal preparation program to complete an internship with a mentor principal. Funds may be used in a variety of ways to accommodate flexible implementation in releasing the intern to meet program requirements.

(2) Participants in the principal internship support program shall be selected as follows:

(a) The candidate shall be enrolled in a state board-approved school principal preparation program;

(b) The candidate shall apply in writing to his or her local school district;

(c) Each school district shall determine which applicants meet its criteria for participation in the principal internship support program;

(d) Applicants submit their applications to the office of the superintendent of public instruction's designee; and

(e) The office of the superintendent of public instruction's designee, with the assistance of an advisory board, shall select internship participants.

(3) The maximum amount of state funding for each internship shall not exceed the actual daily rate cost of providing a substitute teacher for the equivalent of forty-five school days.

(4) Once principal internship participants have been selected, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate the funds to the appropriate school districts. The funds shall be used to pay for partial release time while the school district employee is completing the principal internship.

[ 2019 c 295 s 207; 1996 c 233 s 1; 1993 c 336 s 404.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28A.310.235.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28B.10.033.

Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28B.102.030.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.415.265.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.180.120.

Findings—Intent—Part headings not law—1993 c 336: See notes following RCW 28A.150.210.

Findings—1993 c 336: See note following RCW 28A.150.210.